Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3013
Physician assistants; services performed; collaborative agreement; supervision; requirements.

Under a collaborative agreement with a supervising podiatrist, a physician assistant may perform services that (1) are delegated by and provided under the supervision of a licensed podiatrist who meets the requirements of section 38-3014, (2) are appropriate to the level of education, experience, and training of the physician assistant, (3) form a component of the supervising podiatrist's scope of practice, (4) are medical services for which the physician assistant has been prepared by education, experience, and training and that the physician assistant is competent to perform within the scope of practice of the supervising podiatrist, and (5) are not otherwise prohibited by law. A physician assistant shall have at least one supervising podiatrist for each employer.

Laws 2020, LB755, § 22.